Wisconsin, session 2025, SB295.
do enact as follows:SB295,11Section 1. 807.14 of the statutes is renumbered 807.14 (1).SB295,22Section 2. 807.14 (2) of the statutes is created to read:SB295,2,53807.14 (2) The court may allow the use of artificial intelligence or other 4machine assisted translation, in lieu of or in addition to an interpreter, in any civil 5proceeding.SB295,36Section 3. 885.37 (6) of the statutes is created to read:SB295,2,107885.37 (6) A municipal court or agency may allow the use of artificial 8intelligence or other machine assisted translation, in lieu of or in addition to an 9interpreter, under this section. Such use does not require a waiver under sub. (1) or 10(3) (b).SB295,411Section 4. 885.38 (9) of the statutes is created to read:SB295,2,1412885.38 (9) The court may allow the use of artificial intelligence or other 13machine assisted translation, in lieu of or in addition to a qualified interpreter, 14under this section. Such use does not require a waiver under sub. (4) (a).SB295,515Section 5. 967.09 of the statutes is renumbered 967.09 (1) and amended to 16read:SB295,2,1817967.09 (1) On request of any party, the court may permit an interpreter to act 18in any criminal proceeding, other than trial, by telephone or live audiovisual means.SB295,619Section 6. 967.09 (2) of the statutes is created to read:SB295,2,2220967.09 (2) The court may allow the use of artificial intelligence or other 21machine assisted translation, in lieu of or in addition to an interpreter, in any 22criminal proceeding.SB295,2,2323